Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201576-2244
Principal place of business; requirements.

Each credential holder shall designate in the manner prescribed by the board a principal place of business. Upon any change of his or her principal place of business, a credential holder shall promptly give notice thereof in writing to the board and the board shall issue a new proof of credentialing for the unexpired term.

Laws 1990, LB 1153, § 44;

Laws 1991, LB 203, § 48;

Laws 2001, LB 162, § 36;

Laws 2008, LB1011, § 15;

Laws 2015, LB139, § 64.